District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

25-796

Valet parking.

Repealed.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 104(b), 51 DCR 881
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(k), 53 DCR 6794
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 5(e), 55 DCR 6289